Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1888.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 56ASTATEWIDE ADVISORY COUNCIL ON PLAYGROUND SAFETYSec.56A01. Definitions.56A02. Council.56A03. Powers and duties.§ 56A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718 "Council." The Statewide Advisory Council on Playground Safety established in section 56A02 (relating to council) . "Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Playground." An improved outdoor area designed, equipped and set aside for children's play which is not intended for use as an athletic playing field or athletic court. The term shall include any play equipment, surfacing, fencing, signs, internal pathways, internal land forms, vegetation and related structures. The term shall exclude home playgrounds, home playground equipment, amusement park equipment, sports equipment, fitness equipment and limited access contained play systems."Secretary." The Secretary of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.§ 56A02 . Council. (a) Establishment.--The Statewide Advisory Council on Playground Safety is established. The council shall consist of 25 members appointed by the Governor. The term of office of the members shall be three years, except for the cabinet officers or their designees who shall serve for as long as they are in office.(b) Membership.--The membership of the council shall be representative of parents of school-age children, school districts, school boards, local municipalities and government, public and private providers of child care, nonpublic schools, charter schools, safety and design experts of playgrounds and play equipment, manufacturers and retailers of playground equipment, homeowner associations, churches, resorts, injury prevention specialists and relevant Commonwealth agencies. No 20250HB1888PN2349 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 less than three members of the council shall be certified playground safety inspectors. The members of the council shall include the following members:(1) The secretary or a designee.(2) The Secretary of Conservation and Natural Resources or a designee.(3) The Secretary of Education or a designee.(4) The Secretary of Environmental Protection or a designee.(5) The Secretary of Health or a designee.(6) The Secretary of Human Services or a designee.(7) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a designee.(8) A representative from a city of any class.(9) A representative from a borough.(10) A representative from a first class township.(11) A representative from a second class township.(12) A representative selected by the Pennsylvania Recreation and Park Society.(13) A member appointed by each of the following:(i) The Majority Leader of the Senate.(ii) The Majority Leader of the House of Representatives.(iii) The Minority Leader of the Senate.(iv) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(c) Designees.--The designees of cabinet officers under sub section (b) must be deputy secretaries, commissioners or bureau directors.(d) Officers.--The chair of the council shall be appointed by the Governor and must be selected from those members who are 20250HB1888PN2349 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 neither employees of the Commonwealth nor elected officials.(e) Committees.--The chair of the council may appoint special committees, which may include nonmembers of the council, to make recommendations to the council concerning key issues related to this chapter . (f) Compensation of members.--The members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in accordance with the rules of the Executive Board.(g) Staff.--Staff services for the council shall be provided by the department.§ 56A03 . Powers and duties. The council has the following powers and duties:(1) To review and comment to the department, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, the Department of Education, the Department of Environmental Protection, the Department of Health, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Labor and Industry on draft regulations and standards as they pertain to playground safety.(2) To review and comment to the appropriate legislative committees and the Independent Regulatory Review Commission on any proposed playground safety regulations and standards. (3) To assist and advise Commonwealth agencies in their efforts to improve playground safety . This shall include the following:(i) Recommendations for the implementation and enforcement of regulations and standards.(ii) Suggestions regarding sources of fiscal and other support from Federal, State, local and private 20250HB1888PN2349 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sources for the upgrade of playgrounds to comply with regulations and standards for safety.(iii) Recommendations regarding personnel training in playground safety and inspection.(iv) Recommendations for the improvement of playground safety and inspection procedures.(v) Recommendations for the development of a reporting mechanism for parents and others in the community who feel a playground may be unsafe.(vi) Consideration of safety plan models to be utilized by communities and schools in assisting with their own development of safety plans.(4) To meet at least four times a year.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1888PN2349 - 5 - 1234567891011121314